Idaho statutes. Title 72 WORKER’S COMPENSATION AND RELATED LAWS — INDUSTRIAL COMMISSION
Chapter 14 FIREMEN’S RETIREMENT FUND
§ 72-1453 — 72-1460. [Reserved.]

In the event a paid firefighter is killed or sustains injury from which death results, while in the performance of duty and leaves surviving a spouse or a spouse with the firefighter’s surviving child or children, the spouse, during his or her lifetime, shall be paid from the public employee retirement account [fund] the same pension the deceased firefighter would have been entitled to had the deceased firefighter retired as of the date of death, but in no event less than a monthly sum equal to: (a) sixty-five percent (65%) of the average paid firefighter’s salary or wage in this state, if the deceased firefighter was an Option I firefighter, less any portion of the benefit transferred to an alternate payee as provided in sections 59-1319 and 59-1320, Idaho Code; or, (b) sixty-five percent (65%) of the deceased firefighter’s average monthly salary or wage, based on his average final compensation, if the deceased firefighter was an Option II firefighter, less any portion of the benefit transferred to an alternate payee as provided in sections 59-1319 and 59-1320, Idaho Code. If the surviving spouse should die, the full retirement pay shall be paid to the firefighter’s surviving child or children until they reach the age of eighteen (18) years or shall marry, whichever occurs first; provided, however, that if said deceased firefighter shall have died without leaving a surviving spouse and leaving surviving a child or children, said firefighter’s surviving child or children shall be entitled to be paid from the public employee retirement account [fund] the same pension the deceased firefighter would have been entitled to had the deceased firefighter retired as of the date of death, less any portion of the benefit transferred to an alternate payee as provided in sections 59-1319 and 59-1320, Idaho Code, until they shall reach the age of eighteen (18) years or shall marry, whichever occurs first.

The monthly benefits provided for in this section shall vary annually according to the cost of living adjustment as set forth in section 72-1471, Idaho Code.

Those benefits payable under the provisions of subsection (1) of this section, or under the provisions of section 72-1445, Idaho Code, which were ordered prior to July 1, 1978, shall continue under the provisions of this chapter in effect at the time such benefit payment was ordered.

§ 72-1462. Death benefits — Spouse of retired firefighter.

In the event a paid firefighter, retired on retirement pay, shall die and leave surviving a spouse, but no minor children, such surviving spouse shall receive for life the retirement benefits to which the deceased firefighter was entitled, less any portion of the benefit transferred to an alternate payee as provided in sections 59-1319 and 59-1320, Idaho Code.

Those benefits payable under the provisions of subsection (1) which were ordered prior to July 1, 1978, shall continue under the provisions of this chapter in effect at the time such benefit payment was ordered.

Eligibility for benefits of surviving spouses that was terminated on or after July 1, 1987, solely because of the spouse’s remarriage is hereby reinstated effective July 1, 1992. Such spouses are entitled to have the benefits, including any cost of living allowances approved by the board effective on or after July 1, 1987, commence prospectively effective July 1, 1992, or upon their application to the retirement system, whichever is later.

§ 72-1463. Death benefits — Surviving spouse and surviving child or children of retired firefighter.

In the event a paid firefighter, retired on retirement pay, shall die and leave surviving a spouse, or a spouse and firefighter’s surviving child or children, the spouse, during the spouse’s lifetime shall be paid the retirement pay to which the deceased firefighter was eligible. If the surviving spouse dies the same retirement pay shall be paid to the firefighter’s surviving child or children until they reach the age of eighteen (18) years or shall marry, whichever occurs first. Should a paid firefighter, retired on retirement pay, die without leaving a surviving spouse, and leave surviving him or her a minor child or children, said child or children shall be entitled to receive the pension to which said firefighter was entitled until they marry or shall attain eighteen (18) years of age, whichever occurs first.

Eligibility for benefits of surviving spouses that was terminated on or after July 1, 1987, solely because of the spouse’s remarriage is hereby reinstated effective July 1, 1992. Such spouses are entitled to have the benefits, including any cost of living allowances approved by the board effective on or after July 1, 1987, commence prospectively effective July 1, 1992, or upon their application to the retirement system, whichever is later.

§ 72-1464. Death benefits — Surviving spouse and children of firefighter dying from causes unconnected with duties but during service after five years.

In the event a paid firefighter who shall have died from causes unconnected with said firefighter’s official duties, but during the period of said firefighter’s service, leaves surviving a spouse or a spouse with firefighter’s surviving child or children, and who shall have completed less than twenty (20) years, but more than five (5) years of active service as defined in subsection (H) of section 72-1403, Idaho Code, as a paid firefighter, said spouse, during the spouse’s lifetime shall be paid from the account [fund] a monthly sum equal to: (a) two percent (2%) of the average paid firefighter’s salary or wage in this state, if the deceased firefighter was an Option I firefighter, for each year’s active service, less any portion of the benefit transferred to an alternate payee as provided in sections 59-1319 and 59-1320, Idaho Code; or, (b) two percent (2%) of said firefighter’s average monthly salary or wage, based on his average final compensation, if the deceased firefighter was an Option II firefighter, for each year’s active service, less any portion of the benefit transferred to an alternate payee as provided in sections 59-1319 and 59-1320, Idaho Code. The monthly sum for Option I benefits shall vary annually, according to the determination of the average paid firefighter’s salary or wage in this state as set forth in section 72-1431, Idaho Code. If said surviving spouse dies, said monthly sum shall be paid to the firefighter’s surviving child or children until they reach the age of eighteen (18) years or shall marry, whichever occurs first; provided, however, that if said deceased firefighter shall have died without leaving a surviving spouse and leaving surviving a child or children, said firefighter’s surviving child or children shall be entitled to receive said monthly sum until they shall reach the age of eighteen (18) years or shall marry, whichever occurs first.

In the event a paid firefighter who shall have died from causes unconnected with said firefighter’s official duties, but during the period of said firefighter’s service, leaves surviving a spouse or a spouse with firefighter’s surviving child or children, and who shall have completed less than twenty-five (25) years, but more than twenty (20) years of active service as defined in subsection (H) of section 72-1403, Idaho Code, as a paid firefighter, said spouse, during his or her lifetime shall be paid from the account [fund] a monthly sum equal to the sum the firefighter would have received under the provisions of section 72-1435, Idaho Code, had said firefighter retired as of the date of his or her death, less any portion of the benefit transferred to an alternate payee as provided in sections 59-1319 and 59-1320, Idaho Code, and for the purposes of this section, said firefighter shall be deemed to have retired as of the date of death. The monthly retirement sum shall vary annually according to the determination of the cost of living adjustment as set forth in section 72-1471, Idaho Code, and if said spouse dies said monthly sum shall be paid to the firefighter’s surviving child or children until they reach the age of eighteen (18) years or shall marry, whichever occurs first, provided, however, that if said deceased firefighter shall have died without leaving a surviving spouse and leaving surviving a child or children, said firefighter’s surviving child or children shall be entitled to receive said monthly sum until they reach the age of eighteen (18) years or shall marry, whichever occurs first.
(3) Those benefits payable under the provisions of subsections (1) and (2) of this section which were ordered prior to July 1, 1978, shall continue under the provisions of this chapter in effect at the time such benefit payment was ordered.

(4) Eligibility for benefits of surviving spouses that was terminated on or after July 1, 1987, solely because of the spouse’s remarriage is hereby reinstated effective July 1, 1992. Such spouses are entitled to have the benefits, including any cost of living allowances approved by the board effective on or after July 1, 1987, commence prospectively effective July 1, 1992, or upon their application to the retirement system, whichever is later.

§ 72-1465. Death benefits — Spouse and children of firefighter dying from causes unconnected with duties but during service after twenty-five years.

In the event a paid firefighter who shall have died from causes unconnected with said firefighter’s official duties, but during the period of said firefighter’s service, and left surviving a spouse or a spouse with the firefighter’s surviving child or children, and who shall have completed twenty-five (25) years’ active service as defined in subsection (H) of section 72-1403, Idaho Code, as a paid firefighter, said spouse, during his or her lifetime shall be paid from the account [fund] a monthly sum equal to: (a) sixty-five percent (65%) of the average paid firefighter’s salary or wage in this state, if the deceased firefighter was an Option I firefighter, less any portion of the benefit transferred to an alternate payee as provided in sections 59-1319 and 59-1320, Idaho Code; or, (b) sixty-five percent (65%) of said firefighter’s average monthly salary or wage, based on his average final compensation, if the deceased firefighter was an Option II firefighter, less any portion of the benefit transferred to an alternate payee as provided in sections 59-1319 and 59-1320, Idaho Code. The monthly sum shall vary annually according to the determination of the cost of living adjustment as set forth in section 72-1471, Idaho Code, and if he or she dies said monthly sum shall be paid to the firefighter’s surviving child or children until they shall reach the age of eighteen (18) years or shall marry, whichever occurs first; provided, however, that if said deceased firefighter shall have died without leaving a surviving spouse and leaving a child or children, said firefighter’s surviving child or children shall be entitled to receive the pension which said firefighter was entitled until they shall reach the age of eighteen (18) years or shall marry, whichever occurs first.

Those benefits payable under the provisions of subsection (1) which were ordered prior to July 1, 1978, shall continue under the provisions of this chapter in effect at the time such benefit payment was ordered.

Eligibility for benefits of surviving spouses that was terminated on or after July 1, 1987, solely because of the spouse’s remarriage is hereby reinstated effective July 1, 1992. Such spouses are entitled to have the benefits, including any cost of living allowances approved by the board effective on or after July 1, 1987, commence prospectively effective July 1, 1992, or upon their application to the retirement system, whichever is later.

§ 72-1466 — 72-1470. [Reserved.]

In addition to the monthly sums provided for under this chapter, any retired firefighter or his or her surviving spouse, child, or children drawing benefits shall be entitled to receive adjustments to such benefits, calculated on the percentage of increase or decrease in the average paid firefighter’s salary or wage, in this state, as computed under the terms of section 72-1431, Idaho Code.

Part-time Firefighters.

The Idaho industrial commission’s order, finding part-time firefighters were “paid firefighters” entitled to a cost of living adjustment from the Firemen’s Retirement Fund, was void because, under§ 72-1428, the commission only had jurisdiction to decide specific claims and did not have jurisdiction to decide a petition for declaratory relief, which had to be pursued in a district court. Idaho Retired Firefighters Ass’n v. Public Emple. Ret. Bd., — Idaho —, 443 P.3d 207 (2019).

§ 72-1472. Separability.

If any clause, section or provision of this chapter be found to be unconstitutional, the remainder of this chapter shall remain in full force and effect, notwithstanding such invalidity.

§ 72-1429A — 72-1429D. Pension payment — Voluntary retirement after twenty, twenty-five — Thirty or thirty-five years. [Repealed.]

§ 72-1441. Date of payment.

§ 72-1451. Disability — Reexamination — Return to service.

§ 72-1461. Death benefits — Spouse and the surviving child or children of firefighter killed in performance of duty.

§ 72-1471. Cost of living adjustment.